Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,178
Coordination of benefits.

A health maintenance organization may, but shall not be required to, adopt coordination-of-benefits provisions to avoid overinsurance and to provide for the orderly payment of claims when a person is covered by two or more group health insurance or health care plans. If a health maintenance organization adopts coordination-of-benefits provisions, the provisions shall be consistent with the coordination-of-benefits provisions that are in general use in the state for coordinating coverage between two or more group health insurance or health care plans. To the extent necessary for health maintenance organizations to meet their obligations as secondary carriers under the rules for coordination, health maintenance organizations shall make payments for services that are received from nonparticipating providers, provided outside their service areas, or not covered under the terms of their group contracts or evidence of coverage.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 87.